Contents/Resources/Wolfram Player.app/Contents/SystemFiles/Components/SpellingData/SpellingDictionaries/de_DE.aff
SET UTF-8
TRY esijanrtolcdugmphbyfvkwqxzäüößáéêàâñESIJANRTOLCDUGMPHBYFVKWQXZÄÜÖÉ-.

KEY qwertzuiopü|asdfghjklöä|yxcvbnm

FLAG num
SFX 1986 Y 1
SFX 1986 0 tab .
SFX 394 Y 1
SFX 394 0 tag .
SFX 2879 Y 1
SFX 2879 0 tal .
SFX 3787 Y 1
SFX 3787 0 tar .
SFX 515 Y 1
SFX 515 0 a .
SFX 18 Y 1
SFX 18 0 d .
SFX 4 Y 1
SFX 4 0 e .
SFX 1389 Y 1
SFX 1389 0 i .
SFX 268 Y 1
SFX 268 0 l .
SFX 8 Y 1
SFX 8 0 m .
SFX 1 Y 1
SFX 1 0 n .
SFX 3826 Y 1
SFX 3826 0 o .
SFX 6 Y 1
SFX 6 0 r .
SFX 3 Y 1
SFX 3 0 s .
SFX 11 Y 1
SFX 11 0 t .
SFX 1569 Y 1
SFX 1569 0 ervice .
SFX 1109 Y 1
SFX 1109 0 paar .
SFX 4409 Y 1
SFX 4409 0 student .
SFX 4187 Y 1
SFX 4187 0 gesetzgebung .
SFX 2432 Y 1
SFX 2432 0 werbungen .
SFX 4667 Y 1
SFX 4667 0 ektionen .
SFX 4362 Y 1
SFX 4362 0 aggregate .
SFX 2532 Y 1
SFX 2532 0 feuer .
SFX 862 Y 1
SFX 862 0 twicklung .
SFX 4833 Y 1
SFX 4833 0 gebnissen .
SFX 2785 Y 1
SFX 2785 0 chreiber .
SFX 518 Y 1
SFX 518 0 sdienst .
SFX 3504 Y 1
SFX 3504 0 kolonien .
SFX 1535 Y 1
SFX 1535 0 codes .
SFX 1784 Y 1
SFX 1784 0 positionen .
SFX 3063 Y 1
SFX 3063 0 profile .
SFX 3138 Y 1
SFX 3138 0 profils .
SFX 1918 Y 1
SFX 1918 0 icherungen .
SFX 4557 Y 1
SFX 4557 0 unterschiede .
SFX 1898 Y 1
SFX 1898 0 sforschungen .
SFX 2490 Y 1
SFX 2490 0 assistent .
SFX 4298 Y 1
SFX 4298 0 ntechniken .
SFX 2200 Y 1
SFX 2200 0 sbeschlüsse .
SFX 3960 Y 1
SFX 3960 0 krisen .
SFX 3987 Y 1
SFX 3987 0 brötchens .
SFX 1358 Y 1
SFX 1358 0 spielerin .
SFX 4477 Y 1
SFX 4477 0 kulpturen .
SFX 1191 Y 1
SFX 1191 0 anbau .
SFX 2042 Y 1
SFX 2042 0 mangel .
SFX 535 Y 1
SFX 535 0 szeiten .
SFX 3002 Y 1
SFX 3002 0 druckern .
SFX 3305 Y 1
SFX 3305 0 druckers .
SFX 279 Y 1
SFX 279 0 sbereichen .
SFX 358 Y 1
SFX 358 0 sbereiches .
SFX 4406 Y 1
SFX 4406 0 swinkel .
SFX 2147 Y 1
SFX 2147 0 sverboten .
SFX 2336 Y 1
SFX 2336 0 sverbotes .
SFX 4065 Y 1
SFX 4065 0 sbestrebungen .
SFX 3177 Y 1
SFX 3177 0 ereignis .
SFX 1149 Y 1
SFX 1149 0 tests .
SFX 2277 Y 1
SFX 2277 0 chrauben .
SFX 3209 Y 1
SFX 3209 0 affären .
SFX 2064 Y 1
SFX 2064 0 werbung .
SFX 461 Y 1
SFX 461 0 bändern .
SFX 4132 Y 1
SFX 4132 0 timme .
SFX 4783 Y 1
SFX 4783 0 pionier .
SFX 3197 Y 1
SFX 3197 0 ausfalls .
SFX 1237 Y 1
SFX 1237 0 anweisung .
SFX 4710 Y 1
SFX 4710 0 wänden .
SFX 181 Y 1
SFX 181 0 platzes .
SFX 1909 Y 1
SFX 1909 0 muster .
SFX 3814 Y 1
SFX 3814 0 sanweisungen .
SFX 3641 Y 1
SFX 3641 0 betrags .
SFX 2125 Y 1
SFX 2125 0 gehäuse .
SFX 4761 Y 1
SFX 4761 0 sentwurfs .
SFX 1063 Y 1
SFX 1063 0 slehre .
SFX 155 Y 1
SFX 155 0 gebiete .
SFX 689 Y 1
SFX 689 0 gebiets .
SFX 3396 Y 1
SFX 3396 0 iegen .
SFX 4488 Y 1
SFX 4488 0 ieger .
SFX 3731 Y 1
SFX 3731 0 ieges .
SFX 2924 Y 1
SFX 2924 0 chluss .
SFX 3184 Y 1
SFX 3184 0 chränken .
SFX 2583 Y 1
SFX 2583 0 diagramme .
SFX 1906 Y 1
SFX 1906 0 rate .
SFX 2534 Y 1
SFX 2534 0 diagramms .
SFX 4290 Y 1
SFX 4290 0 rats .
SFX 2352 Y 1
SFX 2352 0 nutzung .
SFX 3458 Y 1
SFX 3458 0 symbol .
SFX 1923 Y 1
SFX 1923 0 fähigkeiten .
SFX 125 Y 1
SFX 125 0 gesetze .
SFX 3532 Y 1
SFX 3532 0 chlange .
SFX 1615 Y 1
SFX 1615 0 betreibern .
SFX 1657 Y 1
SFX 1657 0 betreibers .
SFX 3165 Y 1
SFX 3165 0 icherheiten .
SFX 4145 Y 1
SFX 4145 0 sohn .
SFX 4744 Y 1
SFX 4744 0 sschiff .
SFX 380 Y 1
SFX 380 0 sform .
SFX 3169 Y 1
SFX 3169 0 gassen .
SFX 3581 Y 1
SFX 3581 0 sland .
SFX 1104 Y 1
SFX 1104 0 svertrages .
SFX 506 Y 1
SFX 506 0 projekten .
SFX 3378 Y 1
SFX 3378 0 projektes .
SFX 3198 Y 1
SFX 3198 0 aufsatzes .
SFX 2468 Y 1
SFX 2468 0 lebens .
SFX 2010 Y 1
SFX 2010 0 hose .
SFX 72 Y 1
SFX 72 0 anlagen .
SFX 3561 Y 1
SFX 3561 0 ware .
SFX 3051 Y 1
SFX 3051 0 sfonds .
SFX 3714 Y 1
SFX 3714 0 schächte .
SFX 926 Y 1
SFX 926 0 drucke .
SFX 397 Y 1
SFX 397 0 drucks .
SFX 106 Y 1
SFX 106 0 arbeiten .
SFX 946 Y 1
SFX 946 0 arbeiter .
SFX 636 Y 1
SFX 636 0 tums .
SFX 4358 Y 1
SFX 4358 0 auswertungen .
SFX 4184 Y 1
SFX 4184 0 hochschulen .
SFX 4474 Y 1
SFX 4474 0 lehrgang .
SFX 1750 Y 1
SFX 1750 0 selementen .
SFX 1870 Y 1
SFX 1870 0 hosen .
SFX 4334 Y 1
SFX 4334 0 gewerkschaften .
SFX 4964 Y 1
SFX 4964 0 sbezeichnung .
SFX 2065 Y 1
SFX 2065 0 verkauf .
SFX 552 Y 1
SFX 552 0 smaßnahme .
SFX 1427 Y 1
SFX 1427 0 bremsen .
SFX 753 Y 1
SFX 753 0 sgeräten .
SFX 3411 Y 1
SFX 3411 0 experiment .
SFX 1729 Y 1
SFX 1729 0 fertigungen .
SFX 3181 Y 1
SFX 3181 0 eilen .
SFX 2710 Y 1
SFX 2710 0 mauern .
SFX 2933 Y 1
SFX 2933 0 bauwerk .
SFX 2465 Y 1
SFX 2465 0 lizenzen .
SFX 922 Y 1
SFX 922 0 samt .
SFX 1770 Y 1
SFX 1770 0 amens .
SFX 3180 Y 1
SFX 3180 0 einteilungen .
SFX 2198 Y 1
SFX 2198 0 sbestimmungen .
SFX 3062 Y 1
SFX 3062 0 räder .
SFX 2788 Y 1
SFX 2788 0 brettchen .
SFX 4808 Y 1
SFX 4808 0 monopol .
SFX 4453 Y 1
SFX 4453 0 ngang .
SFX 3248 Y 1
SFX 3248 0 skommando .
SFX 4957 Y 1
SFX 4957 0 sdokumente .
SFX 2379 Y 1
SFX 2379 0 verhaltens .
SFX 850 Y 1
SFX 850 0 adresse .
SFX 3160 Y 1
SFX 3160 0 kabeln .
SFX 3394 Y 1
SFX 3394 0 kabels .
SFX 3921 Y 1
SFX 3921 0 sgelände .
SFX 1834 Y 1
SFX 1834 0 barkeit .
SFX 1326 Y 1
SFX 1326 0 tunnel .
SFX 3404 Y 1
SFX 3404 0 gedankens .
SFX 2455 Y 1
SFX 2455 0 ringen .
SFX 3652 Y 1
SFX 3652 0 anstiegen .
SFX 329 Y 1
SFX 329 0 seiten .
SFX 2262 Y 1
SFX 2262 0 konzerte .
SFX 2711 Y 1
SFX 2711 0 konzerts .
SFX 1188 Y 1
SFX 1188 0 balles .
SFX 368 Y 1
SFX 368 0 chulen .
SFX 1590 Y 1
SFX 1590 0 sinstituten .
SFX 4462 Y 1
SFX 4462 0 motiv .
SFX 838 Y 1
SFX 838 0 anordnungen .
SFX 2759 Y 1
SFX 2759 0 sentscheidungen .
SFX 3803 Y 1
SFX 3803 0 sindustrie .
SFX 2367 Y 1
SFX 2367 0 chläuche .
SFX 1642 Y 1
SFX 1642 0 häfen .
SFX 4525 Y 1
SFX 4525 0 aufrufen .
SFX 4740 Y 1
SFX 4740 0 sstücke .
SFX 4411 Y 1
SFX 4411 0 sstücks .
SFX 3317 Y 1
SFX 3317 0 ausschnitte .
SFX 3088 Y 1
SFX 3088 0 gangs .
SFX 4005 Y 1
SFX 4005 0 alität .
SFX 4198 Y 1
SFX 4198 0 erhebungen .
SFX 4989 Y 1
SFX 4989 0 palte .
SFX 4167 Y 1
SFX 4167 0 nzahlen .
SFX 3294 Y 1
SFX 3294 0 feder .
SFX 560 Y 1
SFX 560 0 ikel .
SFX 2054 Y 1
SFX 2054 0 beleuchtung .
SFX 4483 Y 1
SFX 4483 0 kanone .
SFX 2274 Y 1
SFX 2274 0 fluges .
SFX 3619 Y 1
SFX 3619 0 knotens .
SFX 2784 Y 1
SFX 2784 0 debatten .
SFX 2893 Y 1
SFX 2893 0 sentscheidung .
SFX 1806 Y 1
SFX 1806 0 al .
SFX 2738 Y 1
SFX 2738 0 ar .
SFX 1805 Y 1
SFX 1805 0 as .
SFX 293 Y 1
SFX 293 0 at .
SFX 2180 Y 1
SFX 2180 0 au .
SFX 1508 Y 1
SFX 1508 0 architekturen .
SFX 3103 Y 1
SFX 3103 0 auflösung .
SFX 700 Y 1
SFX 700 0 gebäuden .
SFX 650 Y 1
SFX 650 0 gebäudes .
SFX 1142 Y 1
SFX 1142 0 nfabriken .
SFX 1396 Y 1
SFX 1396 0 een .
SFX 4345 Y 1
SFX 4345 0 ees .
SFX 2374 Y 1
SFX 2374 0 ausdrucks .
SFX 1458 Y 1
SFX 1458 0 bein .
SFX 856 Y 1
SFX 856 0 effekte .
SFX 4900 Y 1
SFX 4900 0 veränderung .
SFX 1058 Y 1
SFX 1058 0 belastungen .
SFX 4268 Y 1
SFX 4268 0 sgründen .
SFX 2047 Y 1
SFX 2047 0 fassungen .
SFX 1304 Y 1
SFX 1304 0 sordnung .
SFX 4793 Y 1
SFX 4793 0 orchester .
SFX 248 Y 1
SFX 248 0 bildungen .
SFX 1088 Y 1
SFX 1088 0 skonzepten .
SFX 2888 Y 1
SFX 2888 0 skonzeptes .
SFX 107 Y 1
SFX 107 0 werken .
SFX 2868 Y 1
SFX 2868 0 werkes .
SFX 3857 Y 1
SFX 3857 0 fraktionen .
SFX 3845 Y 1
SFX 3845 0 kulptur .
SFX 3382 Y 1
SFX 3382 0 nsatzes .
SFX 1218 Y 1
SFX 1218 0 sanalyse .
SFX 3086 Y 1
SFX 3086 0 gewerbes .
SFX 2639 Y 1
SFX 2639 0 magazinen .
SFX 2486 Y 1
SFX 2486 0 ausdruck .
SFX 1285 Y 1
SFX 1285 0 landschaft .
SFX 4058 Y 1
SFX 4058 0 sexperte .
SFX 3579 Y 1
SFX 3579 0 spräsident .
SFX 2466 Y 1
SFX 2466 0 lichkeit .
SFX 427 Y 1
SFX 427 0 frage .
SFX 228 Y 1
SFX 228 0 vereine .
SFX 221 Y 1
SFX 221 0 vereins .
SFX 1616 Y 1
SFX 1616 0 betreiber .
SFX 1175 Y 1
SFX 1175 0 anten .
SFX 383 Y 1
SFX 383 0 bäume .
SFX 173 Y 1
SFX 173 0 platz .
SFX 3713 Y 1
SFX 3713 0 schächten .
SFX 388 Y 1
SFX 388 0 leitungen .
SFX 4481 Y 1
SFX 4481 0 keller .
SFX 2493 Y 1
SFX 2493 0 abzuges .
SFX 2302 Y 1
SFX 2302 0 serklärungen .
SFX 2005 Y 1
SFX 2005 0 konzernen .
SFX 1712 Y 1
SFX 1712 0 antennen .
SFX 1267 Y 1
SFX 1267 0 agenturen .
SFX 1916 Y 1
SFX 1916 0 kampfes .
SFX 1575 Y 1
SFX 1575 0 chaltungen .
SFX 2085 Y 1
SFX 2085 0 grundes .
SFX 1330 Y 1
SFX 1330 0 smodellen .
SFX 994 Y 1
SFX 994 0 version .
SFX 3407 Y 1
SFX 3407 0 fraktion .
SFX 325 Y 1
SFX 325 0 tage .
SFX 1354 Y 1
SFX 1354 0 tags .
SFX 1522 Y 1
SFX 1522 0 sauftrags .
SFX 1460 Y 1
SFX 1460 0 verbänden .
SFX 375 Y 1
SFX 375 0 pielen .
SFX 1594 Y 1
SFX 1594 0 pieler .
SFX 564 Y 1
SFX 564 0 pieles .
SFX 172 Y 1
SFX 172 0 raum .
SFX 4733 Y 1
SFX 4733 0 szeitpunkten .
SFX 4405 Y 1
SFX 4405 0 szeitpunktes .
SFX 1211 Y 1
SFX 1211 0 bearbeitung .
SFX 1543 Y 1
SFX 1543 0 zügen .
SFX 3624 Y 1
SFX 3624 0 grab .
SFX 3400 Y 1
SFX 3400 0 grad .
SFX 3168 Y 1
SFX 3168 0 graf .
SFX 165 Y 1
SFX 165 0 bewegung .
SFX 1826 Y 1
SFX 1826 0 diskussion .
SFX 2963 Y 1
SFX 2963 0 sprodukte .
SFX 2617 Y 1
SFX 2617 0 sender .
SFX 4956 Y 1
SFX 4956 0 sendes .
SFX 3461 Y 1
SFX 3461 0 statistiken .
SFX 2695 Y 1
SFX 2695 0 sanforderungen .
SFX 362 Y 1
SFX 362 0 raums .
SFX 2918 Y 1
SFX 2918 0 gruben .
SFX 4174 Y 1
SFX 4174 0 ministeriums .
SFX 4396 Y 1
SFX 4396 0 törung .
SFX 1950 Y 1
SFX 1950 0 sbegriffen .
SFX 4764 Y 1
SFX 4764 0 schaftler .
SFX 4322 Y 1
SFX 4322 0 kästchens .
SFX 3531 Y 1
SFX 3531 0 chnittstelle .
SFX 4356 Y 1
SFX 4356 0 berechtigungen .
SFX 3227 Y 1
SFX 3227 0 tange .
SFX 1392 Y 1
SFX 1392 0 gestaltung .
SFX 3183 Y 1
SFX 3183 0 chritt .
SFX 4776 Y 1
SFX 4776 0 rocks .
SFX 2249 Y 1
SFX 2249 0 routen .
SFX 2295 Y 1
SFX 2295 0 türen .
SFX 4365 Y 1
SFX 4365 0 zwecke .
SFX 2416 Y 1
SFX 2416 0 erklärung .
SFX 210 Y 1
SFX 210 0 bahnen .
SFX 4207 Y 1
SFX 4207 0 botschaft .
SFX 687 Y 1
SFX 687 0 sbetrieb .
SFX 3045 Y 1
SFX 3045 0 sobjekte .
SFX 117 Y 1
SFX 117 0 buchs .
SFX 4816 Y 1
SFX 4816 0 konflikt .
SFX 4247 Y 1
SFX 4247 0 sträger .
SFX 3658 Y 1
SFX 3658 0 alaten .
SFX 2016 Y 1
SFX 2016 0 brote .
SFX 2261 Y 1
SFX 2261 0 kurve .
SFX 3953 Y 1
SFX 3953 0 ngewächs .
SFX 2031 Y 1
SFX 2031 0 sstrategien .
SFX 2282 Y 1
SFX 2282 0 aufenthalt .
SFX 3946 Y 1
SFX 3946 0 offizier .
SFX 2581 Y 1
SFX 2581 0 ensembles .
SFX 4681 Y 1
SFX 4681 0 bezüge .
SFX 4994 Y 1
SFX 4994 0 ntum .
SFX 4812 Y 1
SFX 4812 0 lichtes .
SFX 781 Y 1
SFX 781 0 behandlungen .
SFX 508 Y 1
SFX 508 0 entwicklungen .
SFX 2618 Y 1
SFX 2618 0 schirmen .
SFX 2115 Y 1
SFX 2115 0 rennen .
SFX 769 Y 1
SFX 769 0 fenstern .
SFX 778 Y 1
SFX 778 0 fensters .
SFX 4674 Y 1
SFX 4674 0 dampfers .
SFX 3467 Y 1
SFX 3467 0 sscheinen .
SFX 4260 Y 1
SFX 4260 0 spezialisten .
SFX 1217 Y 1
SFX 1217 0 sbedingung .
SFX 417 Y 1
SFX 417 0 flächen .
SFX 2883 Y 1
SFX 2883 0 sstation .
SFX 3159 Y 1
SFX 3159 0 klappen .
SFX 2860 Y 1
SFX 2860 0 aspekt .
SFX 4271 Y 1
SFX 4271 0 sflügen .
SFX 772 Y 1
SFX 772 0 prüfung .
SFX 2034 Y 1
SFX 2034 0 shäuser .
SFX 1055 Y 1
SFX 1055 0 steinen .
SFX 1051 Y 1
SFX 1051 0 längen .
SFX 2164 Y 1
SFX 2164 0 praxis .
SFX 2399 Y 1
SFX 2399 0 portalen .
SFX 1619 Y 1
SFX 1619 0 abbaus .
SFX 715 Y 1
SFX 715 0 fenster .
SFX 2922 Y 1
SFX 2922 0 chreibern .
SFX 2851 Y 1
SFX 2851 0 chreibers .
SFX 2113 Y 1
SFX 2113 0 sbüro .
SFX 4055 Y 1
SFX 4055 0 sgerichte .
SFX 4054 Y 1
SFX 4054 0 sgerichts .
SFX 3690 Y 1
SFX 3690 0 stahls .
SFX 1591 Y 1
SFX 1591 0 sgeschäft .
SFX 3359 Y 1
SFX 3359 0 sprotokoll .
SFX 2356 Y 1
SFX 2356 0 körpern .
SFX 2310 Y 1
SFX 2310 0 körpers .
SFX 1790 Y 1
SFX 1790 0 itzen .
SFX 4326 Y 1
SFX 4326 0 itzes .
SFX 2650 Y 1
SFX 2650 0 fund .
SFX 4386 Y 1
SFX 4386 0 ummern .
SFX 189 Y 1
SFX 189 0 hersteller .
SFX 570 Y 1
SFX 570 0 tück .
SFX 332 Y 1
SFX 332 0 netzen .
SFX 224 Y 1
SFX 224 0 netzes .
SFX 3867 Y 1
SFX 3867 0 bezugs .
SFX 2247 Y 1
SFX 2247 0 sbetrag .
SFX 4043 Y 1
SFX 4043 0 stadion .
SFX 126 Y 1
SFX 126 0 anteile .
SFX 124 Y 1
SFX 124 0 anteils .
SFX 1247 Y 1
SFX 1247 0 sbegriff .
SFX 974 Y 1
SFX 974 0 akademien .
SFX 4041 Y 1
SFX 4041 0 steam .
SFX 2110 Y 1
SFX 2110 0 sklauseln .
SFX 3223 Y 1
SFX 3223 0 termine .
SFX 3568 Y 1
SFX 3568 0 termins .
SFX 2848 Y 1
SFX 2848 0 dörfern .
SFX 4476 Y 1
SFX 4476 0 kult .
SFX 4569 Y 1
SFX 4569 0 swagen .
SFX 150 Y 1
SFX 150 0 verfahren .
SFX 1902 Y 1
SFX 1902 0 saucen .
SFX 402 Y 1
SFX 402 0 zeugen .
SFX 1551 Y 1
SFX 1551 0 sinstitute .
